hu: Jármű rendszámtábla fényvisszaverése: Sötétben világító / Fotolumineszcens; Nagy intenzitású fényvisszaverő; Nem fényvisszaverő; Fényvisszaverő fólia; Egyéb
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės valstybinio numerio šviesos atspindėjimas: Šviečiantis tamsoje / fotoliuminescencinis; Didelio intensyvumo atspindys; Neatspindintis; Atspindinti plėvelė; Kita
da: Refleksionsevne for nummerplade: Selvlysende/fotoluminescerende; Højintensitetsreflekterende; Ikke-reflekterende; Reflekterende folie; Andet
ja: 車両用ライセンスプレート反射率: 暗闇で光る/蓄光性; 高輝度反射; 非反射; 反射シート; その他
nl: Voertuigkenteken reflectiviteit: Glow-in-the-dark/fotoluminescent; Zeer reflecterend; Niet-reflecterend; Reflecterende folie; Overig
cs: Odrazivost registrační značky vozidla: Svítící ve tmě / fotoluminiscenční; Vysoce reflexní; Nereflexní; Reflexní fólie; Jiné
pl: Odblaskowość tablicy rejestracyjnej pojazdu: Świecące w ciemności/fotoluminescencyjne; Wysoka odblaskowość; Nieodblaskowe; Folia odblaskowa; Inne
fr: Réflectivité de la plaque d’immatriculation: Brillant dans le noir/photoluminescent; Hautement réfléchissant; Non réfléchissant; Revêtement réfléchissant; Autre
it: Riflettività della targa del veicolo: Fosforescente/Fotoluminescente; Alta riflettenza; Non riflettente; Pellicola riflettente; Altro
sv: Reflektivitet hos fordonsregistreringsskylt: Självlysande/fotoluminiscerande; Högintensiv reflekterande; Ej reflekterande; Reflekterande beläggning; Övrigt
pt-PT: Refletividade da matrícula do veículo: Brilha no escuro/fotoluminescente; Refletor de alta intensidade; Não refletor; Folha refletora; Outro
tr: Araç plaka yansıtıcılığı: Karanlıkta parlayan/Fotolüminesan; Yüksek yoğunluklu yansıtıcı; Yansıtıcı olmayan; Yansıtıcı levha; Diğer
fi: Ajoneuvon rekisterilven heijastavuus: Pimeässä hohtava / fotoluminesoiva; Voimakkaasti heijastava; Ei-heijastava; Heijastava kalvo; Muu
en: Vehicle license plate reflectivity: Glow-in-the-dark/Photoluminescent; High-intensity reflective; Non-reflective; Reflective sheeting; Other
el: Ανακλαστικότητα πινακίδας κυκλοφορίας οχήματος: Φωσφοριζέ/Φωταυγές; Ανακλαστικό υψηλής έντασης; Μη ανακλαστικό; Ανακλαστική μεμβράνη; Άλλο
ko: 차량 번호판 반사율: 야광/축광; 고휘도 반사; 비반사; 반사 시트; 기타
th: การสะท้อนแสงของป้ายทะเบียนรถยนต์: เรืองแสง/เรืองแสงในที่มืด; สะท้อนแสงความเข้มสูง; ไม่สะท้อนแสง; แผ่นสะท้อนแสง; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Refleksija registarske pločice vozila: Svijetli u mraku / Fotoluminiscentno; Visokog intenziteta, reflektirajuće; Nereflektirajuće; Reflektirajuća folija; Ostalo
pt-BR: Placa veicular refletividade: Brilha no escuro/Fotoluminescente; Refletivo de alta intensidade; Não refletivo; Película refletiva; Outro
de: Reflektivität des Fahrzeugkennzeichens: Nachleuchtend/Fotolumineszierend; Hochreflektierend; Nicht reflektierend; Reflektierende Folie; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Odsevnost registrske tablice vozila: Svetleče v temi/fotoluminiscentno; Visoko intenzivno odsevno; Neodsevno; Odsevna folija; Drugo
ro-RO: Reflectivitatea plăcuței de înmatriculare auto: Strălucește în întuneric/fotoluminescent; Reflectorizant de înaltă intensitate; Nereflectorizant; Folie reflectorizantă; Altele
es: Reflectividad de la placa de identificación del vehículo: Brilla en la oscuridad/fotoluminiscente; Reflectante de alta intensidad; No reflectante; Láminas reflectantes; Otro
nb: Reflektivitet for kjøretøys nummerskilt: Selvlysende/fotoluminescerende; Høyintensitetsreflekterende; Ikke-reflekterende; Reflekterende folie; Annet
sk-SK: Odrazivosť evidenčného čísla vozidla: Svietiace v tme / fotoluminiscenčné; Vysoko reflexné; Nereflexné; Reflexná fólia; Iné
vi: Tem nhãn định nghĩa độ phản xạ của xe: Dạ quang/Phát quang; Phản quang cường độ cao; Không phản quang; Tấm phản quang; Khác
ru: Светоотражающие свойства номерного знака: Светящийся в темноте/фотолюминесцентный; Светоотражающий высокой интенсивности; Несветоотражающий; Светоотражающая пленка; Другое
zh-CN: 车牌反光性能: 夜光/光致发光; 高强度反光; 非反光; 反光贴膜; 其他
bg-BG: Отразителна способност на регистрационната табела: Светеща в тъмното/фотолуминесцентна; Високоинтензивна отразяваща; Неотразяваща; Отразяващо фолио; Друго
zh-TW: 車牌反光性: 夜光/螢光; 高亮度反光; 非反光; 反光膜; 其他